Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 12 Policy Council for Children and Families

49-5-250 through 49-5-264.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 316, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; repealed by Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 49, effective February 12, 2001.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 49 repealed and reserved this article, effective February 12, 2001.